District of Columbia statutes.
32-1609

Grievance procedure.

The Mayor shall direct the Workforce Investment Council to establish and maintain a procedure to receive grievances or complaints alleging violations of the Federal Act from participants and other interested or affected parties. The procedure shall be in accordance with section 181(c) [29 U.S.C. § 2931 ] of the Federal Act.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 10, 47 DCR 4644
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-263, § 2(i), 62 DCR 1518
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-263 substituted “Workforce Investment Council” for “Office of Human Rights.”